Utah statutes.
20A-1-602.   Receiving bribe -- Receiving payments for votes -- Penalties.
(1)  A person may not, for himself or for any other person, directly or
indirectly, by himself or through any person, before, during, or after any
election:
(a)  receive, agree to receive, or contract for any money, gift, loan, or
other valuable consideration, office, place, or employment for:
(i)  voting or agreeing to vote;
(ii)  going or agreeing to go to the polls;
(iii)  remaining or agreeing to remain away from the polls; or
(iv)  refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting, or for voting or agreeing
to vote, or refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting, for any particular
person or measure at any election provided by law; or
(b)  receive any money or other valuable thing because the person induced any
other person to:
(i)  vote or refrain from voting; or
(ii)  vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any
election provided by law.
(2)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person
who commits an offense under Subsection (1) is guilty of a third degree
felony.
